New Jersey, session 221, A4814.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    Schedule II. a.     Tests. The director shall place a substance in Schedule II if he finds that the substance: (1) has high potential for abuse; (2) has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and (3) abuse may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence. b.    The controlled dangerous substances listed in this section are included in Schedule II, subject to any revision and republishing by the director pursuant to subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-3), and except to the extent provided in any other schedule. c.     Any of the following substances except those narcotic drugs listed in other schedules whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis: (1)   Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate. (2)   Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in clause 1, except that these substances shall not include the isoquinaline alkaloids of opium. (3)   Opium poppy and poppy straw. (4)   Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, except that the substances shall not include decocainized coca leaves or extractions which do not contain cocaine or ecogine. d.    Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)   Alphaprodine (2)   Anileridine (3)   Bezitramide (4)   Dihydrocodeine (5)   Diphenoxylate (6)   Fentanyl (7)   Isomethadone (8)   Levomethorphan (9)   Levorphanol (10)  Metazocine (11)  Methadone (12)  Methadone--Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane (13)  Moramide--Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl-propane-carboxylic acid (14)  Pethidine (15) Pethidine--Intermediate--A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine (16) Pethidine--Intermediate--B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate (17) Pethidine--Intermediate--C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid (18)  Phenazocine (19)  Piminodine (20)  Racemethorphan (21)  Racemorphan (22)  Tianeptine and any salt, sulfate, free acid, or other preparation of tianeptine, and any salt, sulfate, free acid, compound, derivative, precursor, or other preparation thereof that is substantially chemically equivalent or identical with tianeptine. (cf: P.L.2007, c.244, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day after the date of enactment.